California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
Carcasses and hides received by the licensed frozen food locker plant or processor shall be identified in a manner prescribed by regulation and inspected, or released, by the brand inspector. It shall be the responsibility of the person who slaughtered the animal to identify each carcass and hide. Operators of licensed frozen food locker plants or processors shall only receive a carcass when the hide and carcass have been properly identified in accordance with this provision. The director shall adopt the regulations reasonably necessary for implementing this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

22004.1.

It is the responsibility of the person who slaughters an animal and delivers the carcass to a licensed frozen food locker plant or processor pursuant to Section 22003 or 22004 to obtain a brand inspection of the hide prior to moving it beyond the first point of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

22005.

The skinning, splitting, and quartering of the cattle slaughtered pursuant to Section 22002 at a licensed frozen food locker plant are not required to be performed by a licensed slaughterer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 828, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

22006.

The licensed frozen food locker plant operator shall maintain a record of every transaction which involves uninspected meat for a period of five years. The record shall show the name of the producer of the cattle and the number of carcasses which were delivered by the producer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

22007.

Any owner or producer of livestock may have them inspected and slaughtered by a licensed slaughterer. The owner or producer may, thereafter, sell the meat from those livestock.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 828, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

22008.

Every person that is not a licensed slaughterer that slaughters cattle shall do all of the following:

(a) Keep a record in a book which he or she keeps for that purpose of all cattle that are slaughtered by him or her. The record shall include the name, address, and telephone number of the person for whom the cattle are slaughtered, a full description of the cattle, including the brands and marks, the date of slaughter, and the name and location of the food locker to which the slaughtered animal is, or the slaughtered animals are, delivered for butchering.

(b) Exhibit the record book on demand of any inspector or peace officer.

(c) Notify a brand inspector within 24 hours if he slaughters a bovine animal and does not deliver the carcass and hide to a frozen food locker plant licensed pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 112500) of Part 6 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 651, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

22009.

Any person who is requested to custom cut or otherwise process for another person any meat from a bovine animal that was not slaughtered by a licensed slaughterer pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 22031) of this chapter, or which was not slaughtered in accordance with either Section 22004 or 22008, shall, before cutting or processing the meat, notify a brand inspector that such meat has been received.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

22010.

Any person receiving meat pursuant to Section 22009 shall keep a record in a book which he keeps for that purpose that discloses the following information on all such meat received:

(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the person delivering the meat. 

(b) The license number of the vehicle used in delivering the meat.

(c) The date the meat was received.

Such person shall keep these records for one year and shall exhibit the records upon demand of any inspector or peace officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Licensed Slaughterers [22031. - 22049.]

22031.

A person shall not engage in the business of slaughtering cattle unless the person has been issued a grant of inspection by the United States Department of Agriculture Food Safety and Inspection Service, except that this requirement does not apply to rendering plants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 828, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

22037.

(a) A mobile slaughter operator, as provided in Section 22001.5, shall file a registration with the bureau that shows the names and addresses of the owners of the unlicensed mobile slaughterer and any other information the secretary may require.

(b) The registration shall be filed with the bureau before a mobile slaughter operator may slaughter cattle pursuant to Section 22001.5.

(c) After notice and hearing, the secretary may cancel the registration of any unlicensed mobile slaughterer for failing to comply with Section 22001.5 or 22008.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 651, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

22044.

Every licensed slaughterer of cattle shall have on file in his office prior to slaughter and shall keep for one year after slaughter, the original bill of sale of cattle which are purchased by him or a consignment slip on cattle which are consigned to him or the certificate of inspection of all cattle which are slaughtered by him.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

22045.

Every licensed slaughterer that slaughters cattle where inspection prior to slaughter is impossible or impractical shall keep a record which sets forth the name of the person from whom the cattle were purchased and identifies them as to color, age, weight, sex, and brand, if any. The record shall be open to inspection by any agent of the department or peace officer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

22046.

Every licensed slaughterer that does not have brand inspection prior to slaughter on each day on which he slaughters, and whose hides are not inspected during the month, shall on or before the 15th day of each month mail to the bureau a written report which shows in separate columns all of the following:

(a) The number of calves, cows, steers, stags, and bulls which were slaughtered during the preceding calendar month.

(b) The number which he slaughtered on each date.

(c) From whom the animals were purchased.

(d) The date of purchase.

(e) The brands on branded cattle and the sex and breed of unbranded cattle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

22047.

It is unlawful for a licensed slaughterer to allow anyone to slaughter cattle at the licensee’s plant, except a person that is licensed to slaughter there or an employee of such person.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

22048.

If a licensed slaughterer desires to change to another location, the person shall notify the bureau of the relocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 828, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

22049.

It is unlawful for a licensed slaughterer to slaughter cattle at any place other than a slaughterhouse at which he is licensed to slaughter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Purchase and Sale of Meat [22081. - 22086.]

22081.

A wholesaler of meat shall not purchase the meat of any animal except from any of the following:

(a) A licensed slaughterer.

(b) Another wholesaler having an established place of business.

(c) An owner or producer of livestock which are slaughtered pursuant to Section 22007.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

22082.

A peddler or retailer of meat shall not purchase the meat of an animal from any person not known to him to be a licensed slaughterer, or a regular wholesale dealer in meat that has an established place of business, except that he may purchase from the owner or producer of an animal the meat of the animal if it was inspected and slaughtered pursuant to Section 22007.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

22083.

Every peddler or retailer of meat that purchases the meat of any animal shall enter all of the following in a book which he keeps for that purpose and exhibit it on demand to any agent of the department or any peace officer:

(a) The name and address of the person from whom the meat was purchased or obtained.

(b) The date of purchase and the price which was paid.

(c) An itemized description of the weight and quantity which was purchased.

(d) The time and place of the delivery of the meat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

22084.

A person, other than a regular wholesaler of meat that has an established place of business or a licensed slaughterer, shall not give, sell, or deliver to any peddler of meat any part of the carcass of an animal.

This section does not apply to the meat of an animal inspected and slaughtered pursuant to Section 22007.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

22086.

It is unlawful for any person to misrepresent the type, kind, or quality of a dressed carcass of any animal or part of such carcass, or the sex, age, or quality of any animal the meat of which is sold.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 11. HORSES, MULES, BURROS, SHEEP, AND SWINE [23001. - 24134.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [23001. - 23123.]



  ARTICLE 1. Application [23001. - 23001.]

23001.

The provisions of this division, including the payment of fees, are applicable to all state and county institutions which are engaging in livestock operations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Regulations [23021. - 23021.]

23021.

The director shall enforce this division. He may make such regulations as are reasonably necessary for such enforcement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Investigations and Seizures [23041. - 23045.]

23041.

The director may make any necessary investigations relative to reported violations of this division, pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180), Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

23043.

Any agent of the department or any peace officer may, for the purpose of making an investigation, do any of the following:

(a) Stop any conveyance which is transporting on any public thoroughfare any horse, mule, burro, or sheep, the carcass of any such animal which has the skin on it, or the hide or skin of any such animal.

(b) Take possession of any horse, mule, burro, or sheep, the carcass of any such animal which has the hide or skin on it, or the hide or skin of any such animal and hold it for 30 days pending an investigation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

23044.

Any expense which is incurred pursuant to Section 23043 shall be paid by the owner. The cost of caring for the property which is held pursuant to Section 23043 is a lien upon the property. The lien may be enforced in the manner which is prescribed in Section 3052 of the Civil Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

23045.

Any animal which is seized by, or comes into the possession of an inspector pursuant to this division shall be disposed of pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 1, Division 9 of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Criminal Penalties [23071. - 23071.]

23071.

Every person that violates any provision of this division is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment of not less than 10 days nor more than 6 months, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Each violation during any day constitutes a separate offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 114.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Civil Penalties and Remedies [23091. - 23093.]

23091.

Any person that violates any provision of this division or any regulation which is issued pursuant to it is liable civilly for a penalty in an amount not to exceed a sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation. Any money which is recovered pursuant to this section shall be paid into the Department of Agriculture Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

23092.

The Attorney General shall, upon complaint by the director, or may upon his own initiative, if after examination of the complaint and evidence he believes a violation has occurred, bring an action for civil penalties in the name of the people of this state in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state against any person violating any provision of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

23093.

The Attorney General shall, upon complaint by the director, or may upon his own initiative, if after examination of the complaint and evidence he believes a violation has occurred, bring an action in the name of the people of this state in the superior court for an injunction against any person violating any provision of this division or any regulation duly issued by the director pursuant to it.

Any proceedings pursuant to this section shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525), Title 7, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The director shall not, however, be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or to show or tending to show irreparable damage or loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Collection and Disposition of Money [23121. - 23123.]

23121.

Any money in the Department of Agriculture Fund which is derived pursuant to this division may be expended for the administration and enforcement of any of the provisions of this code stated in Section 16461, notwithstanding any other provision of law which limits the expenditure of any such money to some specific purpose or to the administration or enforcement of some specific section, article, or chapter, of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

23122.

The director shall, at least once each month, report to the State Controller the total amount of any money which is collected for fees, penalties, judgments or otherwise. He shall, at the same time, pay into the State Treasury the entire amount of the receipts. The receipts shall be credited to the Department of Agriculture Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

23123.

A civil action may be brought by the director to recover any fee, penalty, or other money that may become due pursuant to this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Brands and Brand Records [23251. - 23281.]



  ARTICLE 1. Horses, Mules, Burros, or Sheep [23251. - 23252.]

23251.

Any person that desires to use a brand on horses, mules, burros, or sheep shall be governed by the same provisions and procedures with reference to such animals as are made applicable to the branding of cattle in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 20601) of Division 10 of this code, except Section 20668.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

23251.1.

For the purposes of this article, “brand” also includes a design which is made by applying a super-cold iron that permanently causes white hair growth or a bald mark on the animal.

As used in this section, “super-cold iron” means one that is cooled to at least a minus 195 degrees Celsius (minus 319 degrees Fahrenheit).

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 466.)
-------------------------------------------

23252.

Any person that owns a registered cattle brand may use the same brand on the same location on horses, mules, burros, sheep, or swine if it is not in conflict with a previously registered brand.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Swine [23281. - 23281.]

23281.

Brands for swine may be recorded pursuant to the same provisions and procedures as are made applicable to the recording of brands for cattle in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 20601) of Division 10 of this code, except Section 20668. Such recording, however, is not mandatory.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Inspection of Animals [23401. - 23405.]



  ARTICLE 1. Horses, Mules, and Burros [23401. - 23405.]

23401.

Inspection of horses, mules, and burros for shipment out of the state may be made at the request of the owner in the same manner and for the same fees as are provided for bovine animals pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 21051) of Division 10. This section does not apply to inspections made pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 24101) of Division 11.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 217, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

23404.

A certificate of inspection shall not be issued unless a bill of sale or other proof of ownership is exhibited at the time of the inspection.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

23405.

Every slaughterer of horses, mules, or burros shall have on file in his office for a period of one year after slaughter the original bill of sale of the animals purchased and slaughtered by him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Sale or Gift [23801. - 23802.]

23801.

A person shall not buy, sell, or accept a horse, mule, burro, or sheep, the carcass of any such animal from which the hide or skin has not been removed, or the hide or skin of such animal, unless the seller or donor gives, and the buyer or donee receives, at the time of delivery of the animal, carcass, or hide, a written bill of sale or written instrument, which states the number, kind, and brand or brand and marks of each such hide, skin, carcass, or animal, that is signed by the party that gives it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

23802.

The failure of the seller or donor to give a written bill of sale or written instrument to the buyer or donee pursuant to Section 23801 does not have any effect upon either of the following:

(a) The validity of any sale or contract of sale of any horse, mule, burro, or sheep.

(b) The rights of either the buyer or donee or seller or donor of the horse, mule, burro, or sheep.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Transportation [23981. - 23981.]

23981.

A person shall not transport any sheep, unless the sheep are accompanied by a bill of lading which shows all of the following:

(a) The name of the owner of the sheep.

(b) The destination of the sheep.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Drugging of Horses [24000. - 24018.]

24000.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) That the public has a valuable interest in public equine events and public horse sales.

(b) That it is the intent of this chapter to ensure the integrity of public equine events and public horse sales through the control of performance- and disposition-enhancing substances while limiting permitted therapeutic usage at horse shows and competitions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 289, Sec. 7.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24001.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Event” means a public equine event or public horse sale that is held in the state, including a cutting horse competition, an endurance riding competition, a competitive trail competition, or any other competition as determined by the department by regulation.

(b) An equine event that is subject to this chapter shall meet all of the following criteria:

(1) Money, goods, or services are exchanged for the right to compete.

(2) Individuals compete for a single set of placings, points, or awards
 at the equine event.

(3) (A) For one-day events, the entry fee to enter a single class exceeds fifteen dollars ($15) and either no other fees are charged or other fees charged exceed sixty dollars ($60). Fees charged may include ground fees, stall fees, or any other fees composed of money, goods, or services assessed to permit competitors to enter into the event.

(B) The secretary may, by regulation, increase the amounts specified in subparagraph (A), in consultation with the advisory committee appointed pursuant to Section 24013.5.

(c) Sales that are subject to this chapter are public sales that permit a horse to be consigned for public sale.

(d) The following events are excluded from this chapter:

(1) Competitions subject to the jurisdiction of the California Horse Racing Board.

(2) Sales consisting solely of racing stock.

(3) Parade horse competitions.

(4) A timed rodeo-related performance competition when held apart from a horse show, including, but not limited to, rodeo, roping club, cattle team penning, barrel racing, and gymkhana.

(e) “Event manager” means the person in charge of an event, including the entity or individual financially responsible for the event that is responsible for registering the event with the department, and who is responsible for the assessment, collection, and remittance of fees. “Event manager” includes horse show secretaries and managers, competitive event managers, and horse sale managers and sale owners.

(f) “Horse” means all horses, mules, and asses.

(g) “Licensed veterinarian” means a person licensed as a veterinarian by
 the State of California.

(h) “Prohibited substance” means a stimulant, depressant, tranquilizer, anesthetic, including any local anesthetic, sedative analgesic, corticosteroid, anabolic steroid, or agent that would sore a horse, that could affect the performance, soundness, or disposition of a horse, or any drug, regardless of how harmless or innocuous it might otherwise be, that could interfere with the detection of any prohibited substance, including any metabolite or derivative of any prohibited substance.

(i) “Permissible substance” means a substance for which the department has established a limitation on dosage or a maximum permissible detectable level for the purposes provided in Section 24000.

(j) “Therapeutic administration” means the administration of a drug, medicine, or other substance that is necessary for the treatment of an illness or injury diagnosed by a licensed veterinarian. The administration of a prescription drug, medicine, or other substance shall only be as given or prescribed by the licensed veterinarian. The administration of a nonprescription drug, medicine, or other substance shall be in accordance with the directions on the manufacturer’s label.

(k) “Exempt medication” means an oral or topical medication containing prohibited substances determined by the department to be exempt from this chapter when administered therapeutically.

(l) “Public equine event” means a horse show or competition that permits a person to enter a horse for show or
 competition in exchange for money, goods, or services. Any club or group that permits people to join or enter into competition in exchange for money, goods, or services, is “public” for purposes of this chapter.

(m) “Public horse sale” is a sale that consigns a horse in exchange for money, goods, or services, excluding sales consisting solely of racing stock.

(n) “Stimulant or depressant” means a medication that stimulates or depresses the circulatory, respiratory, or central or peripheral nervous system.

(o) To “sore” means to apply an irritating or blistering agent internally or externally for the purpose of affecting the performance, soundness, or disposition of a horse.

(p) “Trainer” means a person who has the responsibility for the care, training, custody, or performance of a horse, including, but not limited to, a person who signs any entry blank of a public equine event or public horse sale, whether that person is an owner, rider, agent, coach, adult, or minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 447, Sec. 1.   (AB 1142)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

24002.

The secretary has jurisdiction of all events under this chapter and shall administer and enforce this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 262, Sec. 1.   (AB 945)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

24003.

Except as otherwise prohibited by law, the full use of modern therapeutic measures for the improvement and protection of the health of the horses is permitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 227, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

24004.

A horse shall not be shown in any class at an event if it has been administered in any manner a prohibited substance or permissible substance in violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 289, Sec. 9.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24005.

The trainer or owner, or both the trainer and owner, in the absence of substantial evidence to the contrary, is responsible for a horse’s condition and is charged with knowledge of the provisions contained in this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. If a trainer is prevented from performing his or her duties, including responsibility for the condition of a horse in his or her care, by illness or other cause, or is absent from any event where a horse under his or her care is entered and stabled, the trainer shall immediately notify the secretary or manager of the event, and at the same time a substitute shall be appointed by the trainer. The substitute shall place his or her name on the entry blank at that time. The substitute shall
 have the same responsibilities as the substituted trainer would have had for the condition of any horse in his or her care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 116, Sec. 5.   (AB 1388)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

24006.

A trainer, owner, or both the trainer and owner, event manager, or any person who administers, attempts to administer, instructs, authorizes, aids, conspires with another to administer, or employs anyone who administers or attempts to administer a prohibited substance to a horse in violation of this chapter shall be subject to the penalties provided in this chapter that are applicable to the trainer or owner. The trainer and owner are both responsible for complying with this chapter after any course of medical therapy has been administered or prescribed by a licensed veterinarian employed by either the trainer or owner to examine and treat a horse. A licensed veterinarian who is employed by a trainer or owner to examine and treat a horse is not subject to the penalties
 provided in this chapter solely on account of that examination and treatment or prescription.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 116, Sec. 6.   (AB 1388)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

24007.

(a) In addition to any other penalty or fine prescribed by law, a trainer or owner, or both the trainer and owner, of a horse found to have received a prohibited substance or permissible substance in violation of this chapter, or determined to be in violation of Section 24009 shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation, to be recovered by the secretary in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) In addition to the penalty
 specified in subdivision (a) or any other penalty or fine prescribed by law, the secretary may suspend any trainer or owner, or both the trainer and owner, from all competitions at any public horse show or competition for a period of not less than 90 days or more than one year for each violation. It is unlawful for any person suspended from competition by the secretary to compete in any public horse show or competition during the period of suspension. Any person suspended from competition by the secretary who competes in any public horse show or competition during the period of suspension is subject to the civil penalty prescribed by subdivision (a) for each entry during the period of suspension.

(c) The owner or owners of a horse found to have received a prohibited
 substance or permissible substance in violation of this chapter or determined to be in violation of Section 24009 shall forfeit all prize money or sweepstakes and any trophies, ribbons, and points won at any public horse show or competition by the horse and the same shall be redistributed by the horse show or competition in accordance with its rules or bylaws. The owner shall pay a fee of fifty dollars ($50) to the public horse show or competition. The horse may be suspended for any period of time specified by the secretary. If the violation occurs at a horse sale, the contract of sale is voidable at the buyer’s discretion.

(d) In lieu of civil prosecution by the secretary, the secretary may levy a civil penalty against a person violating any provision of this chapter.

(e) Before a civil penalty is levied, the person charged with the
 violation shall receive notice of the nature of the violation and shall be given an opportunity to be heard, including the right to review the secretary’s evidence and a right to present evidence on his or her own behalf.

(f) Review of the decision of the secretary may be sought by the person against whom the penalty was levied within 30 days of the date of the decision pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(g) After the exhaustion of the review procedure provided in this section, the secretary or his or her representative, may file a certified copy of a final decision of the secretary that directs the payment of a civil penalty and, if applicable, any order that denies a petition for a writ of administrative mandamus, with the clerk of the superior court of any county. Judgment shall be entered immediately by the clerk in conformity with the decision or
 order. No fees shall be charged by the clerk of the superior court for the performance of any official service required in connection with the entry of judgment pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 289, Sec. 10.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24008.

A horse at an event is subject to examination under the direction of a licensed veterinarian of the department or agent of the licensed veterinarian. The appointed licensed veterinarian, with the approval of the department, may appoint technicians and agents to perform certain duties under this chapter that are not prohibited by other provisions of law. The examination may include physical, urine, or blood tests, or any other test or procedure at the discretion of the licensed veterinarian, that is necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. Any or all horses in or from a class or all classes in an event or any horse entered into or from any class or competition or sale, whether in competition or not, if the horse is on the show or sale grounds, or any horse
 withdrawn by any person or trainer within 24 hours before a class for which it has been entered as well as any horse withdrawn from any horse sale, may be examined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 116, Sec. 7.   (AB 1388)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

24009.

Whether a horse is in competition or not, refusal to submit a horse in an event for examination, or refusal to cooperate with the licensed veterinarian, or his or her technicians and agents, shall constitute a violation of, and subject the responsible person to, the same penalties that are applicable to prohibited substances or permissible substances under Section 24007. A suitable sample shall be collected from a horse selected for testing by a drug testing agent of the department unless the agent releases the horse from testing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 289, Sec. 11.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24010.

If the chemical analysis of blood, urine, saliva, or other samples taken from a horse indicate the presence of a prohibited substance or permissible substance or any metabolite or derivative thereof, it shall be prima facie evidence that the prohibited substance or permissible substance has been administered to the horse. A hearing shall be held when a positive report is received from a chemist identifying a prohibited
 substance or permissible substance in violation of this chapter, or any metabolite or derivative thereof, unless the requirements of Section 24011 have been met or the prohibited substance or permissible substance consists solely of an exempt medication. The trainer or owner, or both the trainer and owner, responsible for the condition of the horse shall not be subject to the penalty prescribed under this chapter or suspended, and no horse shall be barred from competition until after the conclusion of the hearing and a written ruling thereon has been made by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 289, Sec. 12.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24011.

(a) A horse that has received a prohibited substance shall not be eligible for show, competition, or sale, unless the following requirements have been met and the facts requested are submitted to the department in writing:

(1) Medication shall be therapeutic and necessary for treatment of an illness or injury.

(2) A horse shall be withdrawn from a show or competition for a period of not less than 24 hours after a prohibited substance is administered, unless the department determines a different withdrawal period for a specific prohibited substance or class of substances. A horse shall be withdrawn from a public sale for a period of not less than 72 hours after a prohibited substance or
 permissible substance
 is administered. The withdrawal period for anabolic steroids is 90 days after administration and the withdrawal period for fluphenazine or reserpine is 45 days after administration.

(3) The medication shall be administered by a licensed veterinarian, the trainer, or the owner.

(4) Medication shall be identified as to the amount, strength, and mode of administration.

(5) The statement shall include the date and time of administration of the medication.

(6) The horse shall be identified by its name, age, sex, color, and entry number.

(7) The statement shall contain the diagnosis of the attending veterinarian and reason for administering the medication.

(8) The statement shall be signed by the person administering the medication.

(9) The statement shall be filed with the event manager of the public equine event or general manager of the public horse sale within one hour after administration or one hour after the event manager of the event returns to duty, if administration is at a time other than during show or sale hours.

(10) The statement shall be signed by the event manager or his or her designated representative and time of receipt recorded on the statement by the event manager or his or her designated representative.

(b) If the chemical analysis of the sample taken from a horse treated indicates the presence of a prohibited substance and all the requirements of this section have been fully complied
 with, the information contained in the medication report and any other relevant evidence shall be considered at any hearing provided under this chapter in determining whether any provision of this chapter has been violated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 289, Sec. 13.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24011.6.

The therapeutic administration of a permissible substance is permitted before and during all events except public auctions, provided that the dosage does not exceed any limits, or result in levels that exceed maximum permissible detectable levels, established by the department by
 regulation for the purposes provided in Section 24000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 289, Sec. 14.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24012.

(a) (1) To provide funds for enforcement of this chapter, the event manager of every event shall charge and collect the applicable fee for each horse entered or exhibited in the event, and each horse consigned for public sale. The secretary may, by regulation, set the applicable fee, in consultation with the advisory committee appointed pursuant to Section 24013.5, at an amount necessary to carry out this chapter. An event manager shall be notified of the applicable fee at the time of registration of an event. The event manager of the registered event shall remit the fee established pursuant to this section, in addition to the completed assessment report for the registered event, as prescribed by the secretary, to the department within 15 days after completion of
 the event. The event manager shall maintain event records for a period of two years after the completion of the event. Upon request by the department, the event records shall be made available to the department for inspection and photocopying to enable verification of appropriate fee collection and remittance.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 24001, a show event held over multiple consecutive days, with a different judge on each day, that is registered and managed by the same event manager on the same premises, shall be considered one event for the purpose of the assessment of the fee.

(b) An event manager who does not pay to the department the full amount that is due pursuant to this section shall pay a civil penalty of 10 percent of the amount due plus interest at the rate of 112
 percent per month of the unpaid balance computed from the date of the event. The event manager is personally liable for fees and penalties owed the department pursuant to this section.
